Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 7. INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS

CHAPTER 793. INTERGOVERNMENTAL SUPPORT AGREEMENTS

Sec. 793.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "local government" has the meaning assigned by Section 791.003.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 89 (S.B. 780), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2021.

Sec. 793.002. AUTHORITY TO ENTER AGREEMENT. In accordance with the provisions that apply to an interlocal contract under Chapter 791, a local government may enter into an intergovernmental support agreement with a branch of the armed forces of the United States under the National Defense Authorization Act (10 U.S.C. Section 2679) to provide installation-support services to a military installation located in this state.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 89 (S.B. 780), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2021.